Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1056XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1056XD (2) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 12L.1 Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
1. “Best economic interest” means investment pursuant to the
objective of maximizing risk-adjusted investment returns of the
participants and beneficiaries of a pension benefit plan over a
time horizon consistent with the risk management profile of the
plan.
2. “Consumer” means a person who is a resident of this state
and to which any of the following apply:
a. The person has an interest in an investment company,
including but not limited to mutual funds and exchange-traded
funds, registered with the federal securities and exchange
commission that directly or indirectly owns shares of an
enterprise regulated by the state.
b. The person is a beneficiary of or participant in a
pension benefit plan.
3. “Economic analysis” means a written analysis
demonstrating the factors considered in evaluating the economic
impact of a shareholder-sponsored proposal. At a minimum, the
analysis must address all of the following factors:
a. The subject matter of the shareholder-sponsored proposal.
b. An evaluation of the investment company’s stated reasons
for opposition to the shareholder-sponsored proposal.
c. An evaluation of whether the shareholder-sponsored
proposal reflects the investment objectives and risk management
profile of the pension benefit plan in which the participants
and beneficiaries are invested.
d. An evaluation of the economic benefits and costs of
implementing the proposal, as written, over a time horizon that
reflects the investment objectives and risk management profile
of the plan.
e. The quantifiable impact of the shareholder-sponsored
proposal, as written, on the investment returns of the
participants and beneficiaries of the plan.
f. An explanation of modeling, procedures, or processes used
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-1- sc/ns 1/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to complete the economic analysis.
4. “Fiduciary” means a person who, with respect to a pension
benefit plan, does any of the following:
a. Exercises discretionary authority or discretionary
control with respect to management of the plan or exercises
authority or control with respect to acquisition, management,
or disposition of the plan’s assets.
b. Renders investment advice for a fee or other
compensation, direct or indirect, with respect to moneys or
other assets of the plan or has authority or responsibility to
do so.
c. Has discretionary authority or discretionary
responsibility in the administration of the plan.
5. “Investment company” means the same as defined in 15
U.S.C. §80a-3.
6. “Pension benefit plan” or “plan” means a plan, fund, or
program established, maintained, or offered by a public entity,
including but not limited to a public retirement system as
defined in section 97D.5, if by its terms or as a result of
surrounding circumstances the plan, fund, or program does any
of the following:
a. Provides retirement income or other retirement benefits
to employees or former employees.
b. Results in a deferral of income by employees for a period
extending to the termination of covered employment or beyond.
7. “Proxy advisory firm” means a person who is engaged
in the business of providing proxy voting advice, research,
analysis, ratings, or recommendations to a fiduciary,
shareholder, or investor, including institutional investors.
8. “Public entity” means the state, political subdivisions
of the state, public school corporations, and all public
officers, boards, commissions, departments, agencies, and
authorities empowered by law to enter into public contracts for
the expenditure of public funds, including the state board of
regents and institutions under the control of the state board
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-2- sc/ns 2/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
of regents.
9. “Shareholder-sponsored proposal” means a proposal
submitted to an issuer of securities by a shareholder under 17
C.F.R. §240.14a-8.
Sec. 2. NEW SECTION. 12L.2 Fiduciary voting
responsibilities.
1. A fiduciary shall vote all shares held directly
or indirectly by, subject to, or on behalf of a pension
benefit plan for the benefit of the plan’s participants and
beneficiaries solely in the best economic interest of the plan
participants and beneficiaries.
2. For purposes of this section, with respect to a
shareholder-sponsored proposal, there is a rebuttable
presumption that a fiduciary votes its shares solely
in the best economic interest of the plan participants
and beneficiaries if the fiduciary’s vote follows the
recommendation of the board of directors of the issuer of the
shares, as long as the board includes a majority of independent
directors.
3. With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal,
a fiduciary’s vote in a manner inconsistent with the
recommendation of the board of directors of the issuer of the
shares is presumed to be in the best economic interest of the
plan participants and beneficiaries if any of the following
criteria are met:
a. The fiduciary conducts and documents an economic analysis
demonstrating that such a vote is in the best economic interest
of the plan participants and beneficiaries.
b. On behalf of the fiduciary, a third party conducts and
documents an economic analysis demonstrating that such a vote
is in the best economic interest of the plan participants
and beneficiaries, and the fiduciary determines that the
economic analysis adequately demonstrates that such a vote is
in the best economic interest of the plan participants and
beneficiaries.
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-3- sc/ns 3/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
4. A fiduciary shall not vote in a manner that does any of
the following:
a. Subordinates the economic interest of the plan’s
participants and beneficiaries to any environmental, social,
policy, governance, or ideological goal.
b. Promotes any environmental, social, policy, governance,
or ideological goal, unless, based on an economic analysis, it
is determined that the vote is in the best economic interest of
the plan participants and beneficiaries.
5. With respect to shareholder-sponsored proposals, a
fiduciary shall annually disclose in a report to the treasurer
of state all of the following:
a. Each vote that was inconsistent with the recommendation
of an issuer’s board of directors composed of a majority of
independent directors.
b. The economic analysis conducted and documented with
respect to each vote described in subsection 3 to determine
that the vote was in the best economic interest of the plan’s
participants and beneficiaries.
6. The report required under subsection 5 must be certified
by the chief executive officer and chief financial officer, or
an individual acting in each capacity, of the fiduciary.
7. At least once every three years, a fiduciary shall
back test its economic analysis to ensure that the models,
procedures, and processes it uses predict the best economic
interest of the plan’s participants and beneficiaries, and
shall deliver a report detailing such back testing to the
treasurer of state. Based on such back testing, the chief
executive officer and chief financial officer, or an individual
acting in each capacity, of the fiduciary shall certify that
the economic analysis performed by the fiduciary and included
in the report is effective.
8. The court may award court costs and reasonable attorney
fees to a party who prevails in an action brought under this
section.
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-4- sc/ns 4/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 3. NEW SECTION. 12L.3 Proxy advisory firms.
1. A proxy advisory firm shall not provide proxy voting
advice with respect to shareholder-sponsored proposals
submitted to any enterprise that the state regulates, unless
the proxy advisory firm bases its voting recommendations
solely on the best economic interests of the enterprise’s
shareholders.
2. For purposes of this section, with respect to a
shareholder-sponsored proposal submitted to an enterprise
regulated by the state, there is a presumption that a proxy
advisory firm’s voting recommendation is based solely on the
best economic interest of the enterprise’s shareholders if
the recommendation follows the recommendation of the board of
directors of the issuer of the shares, as long as the board
includes a majority of independent directors.
3. With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal
submitted to an enterprise regulated by the state, a proxy
advisory firm may recommend a vote that is inconsistent with
the recommendation of the board of directors of the issuer of
the shares if the proxy advisory firm conducts and documents an
economic analysis demonstrating that such a vote is in the best
economic interest of the enterprise’s shareholders.
4. With respect to shareholder-sponsored proposals
submitted to an enterprise regulated by the state, a proxy
advisory firm shall annually disclose in a report to the
treasurer of state all of the following:
a. Each vote recommendation that was inconsistent with the
recommendation of an issuer’s board of directors composed of a
majority of independent directors.
b. The economic analysis conducted and documented with
respect to each vote recommendation described in subsection
3 to determine that the vote recommendation was in the best
economic interest of the regulated enterprise’s shareholders.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 12L.4 Consumer right to disclosure.
1. a. If a consumer has reason to believe that the
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-5- sc/ns 5/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
requirements of section 12L.2 or 12L.3 have not been met, a
consumer may submit a request to any of the following to obtain
a copy of the documented economic analysis demonstrating that
such a vote is solely in the best economic interest of the
consumer:
(1) The investment company that owns shares of an enterprise
regulated by the state.
(2) The pension benefit plan, in each case, in which the
consumer is an investor, beneficiary, or participant.
b. There is a presumption that a vote is solely in the
best economic interest of the consumer if the vote follows the
recommendation of the board of directors of the issuer of the
shares, as long as the board includes a majority of independent
directors.
2. a. The investment company or plan shall respond in
writing to the consumer within ninety days of receipt of
a request described in subsection 1 by doing one of the
following:
(1) Providing the consumer with the requested economic
analysis.
(2) Informing the consumer that no economic analysis is
available, if the investment company did not conduct and
document an economic analysis.
(3) Informing the consumer that the vote at issue was
consistent with the recommendation of the board of directors
of the issuer of the shares and such board is composed of a
majority of independent directors.
b. The investment company or plan shall provide information
in response to a consumer request at no cost up to twice
annually per consumer.
Sec. 5. NEW SECTION. 12L.5 Enforcement.
1. This chapter may be enforced by the attorney general.
2. If the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe
that a person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to
engage in a violation of this chapter, the attorney general may
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-6- sc/ns 6/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
do any of the following:
a. Require the person to file on forms prescribed by the
attorney general a statement or report in writing, under oath,
as to all the circumstances surrounding the actual, alleged, or
potential violation and such other data and information as the
attorney general deems necessary.
b. Examine under oath any person in connection with the
actual, alleged, or potential violation.
c. Examine any record, book, document, account, or paper as
the attorney general deems necessary.
d. Issue civil investigatory demands consistent with
investigation into a potential enforcement action.
e. Under an order of the district court, impound any record,
book, document, account, paper, or sample or material relating
to the actual, alleged, or potential violation and retain the
same in the attorney general’s possession until the completion
of all proceedings undertaken under this chapter or in court.
3. The attorney general may initiate an action in the
name of the state and may seek an injunction to restrain
any violations of this chapter. A violation of this chapter
shall constitute irreparable harm. Each share voted by a
fiduciary that is not voted in the best economic interest of
the shareholder constitutes a separate violation. The attorney
general may also seek civil penalties for each violation under
this chapter. All civil penalties issued shall be in equity.
Civil penalties shall not exceed one thousand dollars per
violation. Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall
be deposited in the general fund of the state.
Sec. 6. Section 97A.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees shall be the trustees of the
retirement fund created by this chapter as provided in section
97A.8 and shall have full power to invest and reinvest funds
subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions
imposed by subsection 2 and chapters 12F, 12H, 12J, and 12K,
LSB 1056XD (2) 91
-7- sc/ns 7/10

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and 12L and subject to like terms, conditions, limitations,
and restrictions said trustees shall have full power to hold,
purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the
securities and investments of the retirement fund which have
been invested, as well as of the proceeds of said investments
and any moneys belonging to the retirement fund. The board
of trustees may authorize the treasurer of state to exercise
any of the duties of this section. When so authorized the
treasurer of state shall report any transactions to the board
of trustees at its next monthly meeting.
Sec. 7. Section 97B.4, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. Investments. The system, through the chief investment
officer, shall invest, subject to chapters 12F, 12H, 12J, and
12K, and 12L and in accordance with the investment policy and
goal statement established by the board, the portion of the
retirement fund which, in the judgment of the system, is not
needed for current payment of benefits under this chapter
subject to the requirements of section 97B.7A.
Sec. 8. Section 97B.7A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. d. Prioritize the best economic interest of
the system’s participants and beneficiaries in accordance with
chapter 12L.
Sec. 9. Section 262.14, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
The board may invest funds belonging to the institutions,
subject to chapters 12F, 12H, 12J, and 12K, and 12L and the
following regulations: